Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 39 Governmental Claims
§ 1-39-113.
Claims
procedure.

No action shall be brought under this act against a governmental entity unless the claim upon which the action is based is presented to the entity as an itemized statement in writing within two (2) years of the date of the alleged act, error or omission, except that a cause of action may be instituted not more than two (2) years after discovery of the alleged act, error or omission, if the claimant can establish that the alleged act, error or omission was:

Not reasonably discoverable within a two (2) year period; or

The claimant failed to discover the alleged act, error or omission within the two (2) year period despite the exercise of due diligence.

The claim shall state:

The time, place and circumstances of the alleged loss or injury including the name of the public employee involved, if known;

The name, address and residence of the claimant and his representative or attorney, if any; and

The amount of compensation or other relief demanded.

All claims against the state shall be presented to the general services division of the department of administration and information. Claims against any other governmental entity shall be filed at the business office of that entity. In the case of claims against local governments the claim submitted need not be acted upon by the entity prior to suit. For purposes of this section, “business office” means:

The county clerk of a county, including its agencies, instrumentalities and institutions;

The city or town clerk of a city or town, including its agencies, instrumentalities and institutions;

The secretary of a joint powers board, airport board, public corporation, community college district board of trustees or special district;

The superintendent of a school district;

The president of the University of Wyoming.

In any action under this act, the complaint shall state:

That the claim required under subsection (c) of this section was filed in accordance with this section;

The date the claim under subsection (c) of this section was filed;

That the claim was in compliance with the signature and certification requirements of article 16, section 7 of the Wyoming Constitution.

In any claim filed with a governmental entity under this act, the claim shall be signed by the claimant under oath in substantially the following format:

I,, have read and understand the provisions of the false swearing statute. I hereby certify under penalty of false swearing that the foregoing claim, including all of its attachments, if any, is true and accurate.
Signature of Claimant Date Printed Name of Claimant STATE OF WYOMING COUNTY OF ss Subscribed and sworn to before me, a Notarial Officer, this day of , Notarial Officer My Commission Expires: (Seal).

Click to view

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, § 1; 1985, ch. 49, § 1; 1989, ch. 110, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1992, ch. 41, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2010, ch. 27, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “For purposes of this section, ‘business office’ means” in the introductory language of (c); added (c)(i) through (c)(v); and added (d) through (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Construction. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-39-113(a) is a true nonclaim statute, and therefore the right to file a complaint against the State ceases to exist upon expiration of the limitation period for the presentment of a governmental claim if no valid governmental claim has been presented. Bell v. Schell, 2004 WY 153, 101 P.3d 465,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2004), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Section applicable only to claims accruing after June 30, 1979.
—

The Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, including the two-year claim filing period found in subsection (a), only governs claims that accrue after June 30, 1979, the effective date of the act. Davis v. Casper, 710 P.2d 827,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1985).

Wyoming Governmental
Claims Act's (WGCA) omission of a reference to the tolling provision
contained in the Wyoming Medical Review Panel Act of 2005 evidences
the legislature's intent that the tolling provision does not apply
in the context of the notice-of-claim requirement under the WGCA;
accordingly, the tolling provision in the Medical Review Panel Act
does not operate to toll the two-year period for submitting a notice
of claim to a governmental entity under the WGCA. Stroth v. N. Lincoln County Hosp. Dist., 2014 WY 81, 327 P.3d 121,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2014).

Plain language
of the Wyoming Medical Review Panel Act of 2005 unambiguously indicates
the tolling period applies to the filing of a “complaint”
in any court against a health care provider, but a notice of claim
is not a “complaint” that must be filed in a “court”;
it must be submitted to the governmental entity alleged to have been
responsible for causing harm to the claimant, and if the condition
is satisfied, the claimant is subject to a one-year statute of limitations
for filing an action. Stroth v. N. Lincoln County Hosp. Dist., 2014 WY 81, 327 P.3d 121,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2014).

Eleventh amendment immunity not waived. —

State's waiver of its sovereign immunity for claims brought under this section does not amount to a waiver of its immunity under U.S. Const., Amend. 11. Ware v. Wyoming Bd. of Law Examiners, 973 F. Supp. 1339, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12155 (D. Wyo. 1997), aff'd, 161 F.3d 19, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 33398 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1998).

Applicable to joint powers board. —

A joint powers board is not a “political subdivision” such that it would be required to comply with the requirements of article 16, § 7 of the Wyoming Constitution; a joint powers board is a “governmental entity” and therefore the requirements for this section for bringing a claim apply to a joint powers board. Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

Applicability to inverse condemnation action. —

Limitation period found in Wyoming Governmental Claims Act applied to an inverse condemnation cause of action and to the homeowners' tort claims against a city, and where the undisputed material facts showed that complaints had been filed well beyond one-year period set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-114

, the actions were time-barred. The district court was correct in applying its statute of limitation analysis to all of the state law claims and in dismissing the action on summary judgment. Lankford v. City of Laramie, 2004 WY 143, 100 P.3d 1238,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2004).

Statute of limitations in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

did not apply to an inverse condemnation action because the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., did not apply to such claims, and all prior decisions of the Wyoming Supreme Court to the contrary were reversed. 2013 WY 3,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 2

.

When claim accrues. —

A claim against a governmental entity does not accrue until all contractual terms creating a condition precedent have been exhausted; therefore, where a contract between a construction company and a joint powers board provided for arbitration, the construction company's claim accrued upon completion of the arbitration proceedings and not upon completion of the construction project. Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

The expiration of the school year was not a condition precedent to plaintiff teachers' seeking redress with the court on their breach of contract claims; their claims accrued on the date the school board denied their applications for early retirement benefits. Peterson v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. One, 929 P.2d 525,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1996).

Two-year notice of claim period commenced on date when patient discovered that doctor was actually an employee of county hospital. Romero v. Schulze, 974 P.2d 959,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1999).

A claim against a city board of public utilities for its negligence in failing to properly maintain a fire hydrant and the resulting damage to the plaintiff's home was time-barred since the two year limitations period began to run on the date that the plaintiff discovered water seepage into her basement, rather than on the later date that she discovered that the water came from the city water supply. Rawlinson v. Cheyenne Bd. of Pub. Utils, 2001 WY 6, 17 P.3d 13,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2001).

Although an improvement and service district argued that homeowners failed to file their governmental claim within the two-year statute of limitations, there were issues of material fact as to when the homeowners discovered or should have discovered the district's act, error or omission with respect to a continuous water leak in the district's water main. Moreover, there were genuine issues of material fact surrounding the commencement of the limitation period on the homeowners'
claim for damages associated with a break in the district's water main.
Heimer v. Antelope Valley Improvement, 2010 WY 29, 226 P.3d 860,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2010).

When claim accrues. —

Patient's
medical malpractice claim was timely under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-39-113(a) because he presented his claim to the Wyoming Medical
Review Panel just under two years from the date of his discharge;
he presented evidence that the hospital treated him for the pain and
dysfunction in his shoulder and arm until he was discharged. Nobles v. Mem'l Hosp. of Laramie County, 2013 WY 66, 301 P.3d 517,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2013).

Date must be included in claim. —

In order to invoke the jurisdiction of the district court, an allegation under this section must encompass a statement of the date the claim was filed to demonstrate the filing of the claim within two years of the date of the alleged act, error or omission or, alternatively, the statutory ground for the late discovery of the alleged act, error or omission. Amrein v. Wyoming Livestock Bd., 851 P.2d 769,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. May 19, 1993), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

, with respect to the statute of limitations, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

, the date of the act, error, or omission had to be determined before it could be concluded that the patient timely filed a governmental claim against the doctor within the two-year period; date of discovery of employment relationship was crucial.
Jost v. Goss, 2010 WY 104, 236 P.3d 994,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2010).

Where plaintiff did not even allege the filing of a claim

in his Mississippi complaint, under applicable Wyoming law that would serve to justify dismissal of the complaint for the tort claims. Routh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 1108,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 814, 119 S. Ct. 49, 142 L. Ed. 2d 38, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 4815 (U.S. 1998).

Complaint alleging property right in prison work assignment failed to state a claim under state law, in absence of any allegation that a timely claim was filed as required by this chapter. Garnett v. Hettgar, 2 P.3d 558,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Subject matter jurisdiction. —

Although the Wyoming legislature abolished the distinction between “governmental” and “proprietary functions” with respect to the assertion of claims against the state or its subdivisions in enacting the Governmental Claims Act of 1979, these terms continue to have vitality in determining the subject matter jurisdiction of a court in a particular controversy. Mountain View/Evergreen Improvement & Serv. Dist. v. Brooks Water & Sewer Dist., 896 P.2d 1355,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1995).

District court did not acquire subject matter jurisdiction over a driver's negligence claim against a city because the driver did not include in her complaint an averment that she had complied with the requirements of Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7 and this section.
McCann v. City of Cody, 2009 WY 86, 210 P.3d 1078,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2009), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

When plaintiff injured motorist filed suit against defendant city after his vehicle was struck by a vehicle driven by a police officer, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction to determine whether plaintiff complied with the requirements of this section for filing suit against a governmental entity. Upon presentation of proof that plaintiff had complied with those provisions by providing a notice of claim to the city, the district court also had subject matter jurisdiction to allow him to amend his complaint to so allege.
Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

District court had subject matter jurisdiction to allow amendment of a wrongful death complaint to allege presentation of a notice of claim complying with this section and Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7, which had been timely presented. The amendment related back to the original filing date in accordance with Wyo. R. Civ. P. 15(c).
Hoffman v. Darnell, 2011 WY 65, 252 P.3d 936,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2011).

Claim brought by homeowners with leaky basement accrued when
water discovered in basement. —

Tort claims brought by homeowners — who discovered, after they purchased their homes, that their basements leaked — against the various government entities who inspected and approved the homes, accrued on the dates when the homeowners discovered the water in their basements and suffered damage, and not on the dates when the government entities committed their allegedly negligent acts. Davis v. Casper, 710 P.2d 827,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1985).

In negligence action against surveyors for conducting erroneous land surveys

and against the board of the county commissioners for filing the surveys, the plaintiffs did not “discover” the tortious act for purposes of the accrual of their cause of action until they received a corrected land surveyor's report. The statute of limitations did not begin to run on an earlier date when the title insurance agent advised them that he would not continue to issue title insurance policies because of survey discrepancies. Bredthauer v. Christian, Spring, Seilbach & Assocs., 824 P.2d 560,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1992).

Time for filing claim on behalf of minor

begins to run at the time of the appointment of a guardian ad litem by the court pursuant to Rule 17(c), W.R.C.P. This disability for failing to file a claim disappears upon the minor reaching the age of majority. Dye v. Fremont County Sch. Dist. No. 24, 820 P.2d 982,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1991).

Failure to timely file claim bars suit. —

The failure to file a claim with the governmental entity within the two-year period provided in subsection (a) is an absolute bar to suit. Duran v. Board of County Comm'rs, 787 P.2d 971,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1990).

Claim time-barred. —

Motorist did not establish facts necessary for estoppel to bar a statute of limitations defense where, although the motorist may have been induced by the city attorney to delay filing, she was in no way misled, nor did the city attorney conceal facts to the motorist's detriment. Archuleta v. City of Rawlins, 942 P.2d 404,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1997).

Where the plaintiffs discovered the “act, error or omission” which provided the basis of the claim of inverse condemnation no later than the date of the 1987 flood, the two year time for filing claims under the statute began to run in July 1987, and it had expired by the time plaintiffs filed their claims with the department of transportation in 1995. Waid v. State, 996 P.2d 18,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 2000).

Landowners' monetary claims against a county challenging the conditional use permit application process required under the county's growth management plan should have been dismissed because the landowners failed to comply with the presentment requirements of this section or Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 7; along with other violations, the actions were not filed within the applicable two-year period. Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2005 WY 54, 110 P.3d 875,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2005).

Order dismissing plaintiffs' negligence action against a town was proper because plaintiffs presented to the town a notice of claim that did not meet the requirements of Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 7, being neither signed nor certified to under penalty of perjury. The court appropriately dismissed the action with prejudice, inasmuch as it was then impossible for plaintiffs to comply with the mandatory filing deadline of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

. Wilson v. Town of Alpine, 2005 WY 57, 111 P.3d 290,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2005), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

While the detainee's filing occurred within the one-year limitation period of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-114

, the deputy was not served with the copy of the complaint until much later; pursuant to Wyo. R. Civ. P. 3(b), the suit was not “commenced” until that date, which was outside the one-year statutory period, and as a result, the detainee's state law tort claims against the deputy under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act were time-barred.
Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2010).

District court
did not err in dismissing a personal representative's complaint against
a medical center because the representative failed to submit a timely
notice of claim under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act (WGCA);
the tolling provision contained in the Wyoming Medical Review Panel
Act does not operate to toll the two-year period for submitting a
notice of claim to a governmental entity under the WGCA. Stroth v. N. Lincoln County Hosp. Dist., 2014 WY 81, 327 P.3d 121,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2014).

Because a
personal representative's notice of claim to the Medical Review Panel
was filed over two years after the date of the alleged act, error,
or omission, the Wyoming Medical Review Panel Act of 2005 could not
have operated to toll the time period for filing a notice of claim
under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Stroth v. N. Lincoln County Hosp. Dist., 2014 WY 81, 327 P.3d 121,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2014).

Pest control board independent governmental entity. —

A weed and pest control district under title 11 is an independent governmental entity for purposes of this chapter. Accordingly, the plaintiffs' presentation of a notice of claim to the county board of commissioners within the two-year claim period in lieu of presenting a claim to the wood and pest control board deprived the court of subject matter jurisdiction over the board. Cranston v. Weston County Weed & Pest Bd., 826 P.2d 251,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1992).

Defendant, absent misconduct, not estopped from asserting separate
entity status. —

Although the defendant weed and pest control board had notice during the claims period that the plaintiffs believed they had a claim against the board, after the plaintiffs filed a notice of claim with the county board of commissioners, the board was not estopped from claiming that it was a separate governmental entity where no facts were alleged showing that the plaintiffs' delay in filing was induced by the board, or that the board misled them as to the need to file a claim. Cranston v. Weston County Weed & Pest Bd., 826 P.2d 251,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1992).

Notice requirement. —

A prerequisite in pursuing a claim against the state or its officers is compliance with the notice requirements of the claims act. Allen v. Lucero, 925 P.2d 228,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. Oct. 29, 1996), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Where an individual sued the city and a police officer for negligence, the individual's notice of claim, signed by the individual's attorney but not by the individual, did not meet the constitutional requirements for a valid claim under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., because it was not signed by the individual, and it was not certified to under penalty of perjury; thus, dismissal of the individual's complaint was proper despite any imprecision as to whether the district court dismissed the complaint under W.R.C.P. 12(b)(1) or W.R.C.P. 12(c). Yoak v. Ide, 2004 WY 32, 86 P.3d 872,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2004), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

In a contract case, a construction company fully complied with required notice requirements where a claim stated that a city caused delays by changing project specifications and failing to act to keep a project on schedule and where notice also clearly set forth damages that allegedly resulted from the city's conduct; therefore, supreme court and district court had subject matter jurisdiction to proceed with the matter presented.
City of Gillette v. Hladky Constr., Inc., 2008 WY 134, 196 P.3d 184,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2008).

Where a new prison policy imposed after the murder of a guard prohibited prisoners from keeping certain personal property in their cells, the inmate was notified in June of 2005 that his property would be destroyed; on September 11, 2007, the inmate submitted a claim form to the Wyoming Department of Corrections (DOC) asking that he be repaid for the property's value. Because the inmate did not submit the notice of claim required by this section, the district court did not err by dismissing his civil suit against the DOC.
Cosco v. Lampert, 2010 WY 52, 229 P.3d 962,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2010), cert. denied, 563 U.S. 910, 131 S. Ct. 1798, 179 L. Ed. 2d 666, 2011 U.S. LEXIS 2478 (U.S. 2011).

Signature and certification required. —

Claim filed under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., must meet the requirements of art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., including the requirement that it be signed by the claimant and certified to under penalty of perjury. Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2004).

Where persons injured in collisions with State employees presented putative notices of claim that were neither signed by them nor certified under penalty of perjury, those notices of claim were invalid because they did not meet the requirements of Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7, and the belated attempts to cure the deficiencies were ineffective because the limitation period of the nonclaim statute had passed, thereby extinguishing the statutory right to sue the State, and the plaintiffs did not show that the deficient notices of claim were, or could be, salvaged by the savings statute, by the doctrine of equitable estoppel, or as a matter of public policy. Bell v. Schell, 2004 WY 153, 101 P.3d 465,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2004), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

A negligence case was dismissed for lack of subject matter jurisdiction because a driver did not present, within the mandatory two-year period of this section, a notice of claim personally signed under penalty of perjury, as required by Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7.Wooster v. Carbon County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2005 WY 47, 109 P.3d 893,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. May 10, 2005), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

District court
erred in granting summary judgment to the governmental entities and
their employees based on lack of jurisdiction because, while a personal
representative's negligence claim was neither signed under oath nor
certified, the statutory and constitutional claim requirements were
substantive, but not jurisdictional, and the entities and their employees
waived their defense by failing to properly plead an affirmative
defense
that the claim was defective. Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Itemization in notice of claim. —

When a doctor filed a counterclaim against a government hospital for breach of contract, the notice of claim separated the damages into four categories of direct contractual damages, consequential damages, lost income and relocation. Because the itemization met the statutory and constitutional requirements for notices of governmental claims, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction and erred by dismissing the counterclaim.
Madsen v. Bd. of Trs. of Mem. Hosp., 2011 WY 36, 248 P.3d 1151,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2011).

Notice of claim served on the town by a construction company met the itemization requirements of this section, because it identified the precise dollar amount of damages the construction company was seeking for breach of contract.
Excel Constr., Inc. v. Town of Lovell, 2011 WY 166, 268 P.3d 238,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 2011).

Date of act, error, or omission. —

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

, with respect to the statute of limitations, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

, the date of the act, error, or omission had to be determined before it could be concluded that the patient timely filed a governmental claim against the doctor within the two-year period; date of discovery of employment relationship was crucial.
Jost v. Goss, 2010 WY 104, 236 P.3d 994,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 2010).

Court without jurisdiction over action against governmental
entity where no prior claim filed. —

A district court has no subject matter jurisdiction over a tort action brought by a complainant against a governmental entity, where the complainant fails to allege that a claim has been filed pursuant to this section and where, in fact, no claim has been filed. Dee v. Laramie County, 666 P.2d 957,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1983), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

The court lacked jurisdiction to hear plaintiff school teachers' breach of contract claims against the school board where the teachers failed to comply with this section's notice requirements. Peterson v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. One, 929 P.2d 525,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1996).

Failure to meet the filing requirements of this act constituted an independent basis for barring claims. Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994).

Lawsuit filed within year after untimely claim barred. —

A lawsuit filed within a year after an untimely claim under this section, but not within a year after a timely claim, was barred by the statute of limitations (§

1-39-114

). Davis v. Casper, 710 P.2d 827,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1985).

Action for intentional infliction of emotional distress against board of bar examiners was barred

by plaintiff's failure to file a claim pursuant to this section. Ware v. Wyoming Bd. of Law Examiners, 973 F. Supp. 1339, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12155 (D. Wyo. 1997), aff'd, 161 F.3d 19, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 33398 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1998).

Barred claims cannot be revived. —

Assessment district did not file its action in time with respect to the areas covered in its first claim which was barred by the statute. The inclusion of barred claims with non-barred claims in the second notice of claim filed does not adjust this result; the plain language of the statute prevents a plaintiff from reviving a barred claim by including it in a claim for other damages that is not time barred. Mountain View/Evergreen Improvement & Serv. Dist. v. Brooks Water & Sewer Dist., 896 P.2d 1355,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1995).

Action between two governmental entities involving state educational
funding. —

The Wyoming Governmental Claims Act is not applicable to an action between two governmental entities when the relief sought is a declaration of rights and liabilities of the governmental entitles under statutes affecting state educational funding and for the recovery of monies that should have been distributed in the past. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

Applied

in

Board of Trustees v. Bell, 662 P.2d 410,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1983); Lafferty v. Nickel, 663 P.2d 168,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1983); Boyd v. Nation, 909 P.2d 323,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Milton v. Mitchell, 762 P.2d 372,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1988); Shubert v. Dexter, 891 P.2d 55,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1995); Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

Stated

in

Eathorne v. Bd. of Trustees, 2001 WY 36,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 47

, 21 P.3d 745 (Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Compass Ins. Co. v. Cravens, Dargan & Co., 748 P.2d 724,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1988); Scott v. School Dist. No. 6, 815 F. Supp. 424, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2899 (D. Wyo. 1993); Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993); Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2001 WY 33, 20 P.3d 521,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2001); Jauregui v. Memorial Hosp. of Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 59, 111 P.3d 914,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(2005); Lavatai v. State, 2005 WY 133,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 159

, 121 P.3d 121 (2005); Reed v. Cloninger, 2006 WY 37, 131 P.3d 359,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. Mar. 24, 2006); Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Oct. 13, 2008); Hall v. Park County, 2010 WY 124, 238 P.3d 580,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Sept. 3, 2010); Jackman Constr. v. Town of Baggs, 2012 WY 80, 278 P.3d 247,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(June 12, 2012).

Construction with other statutes.—

Although a claimant might have up to three years to file a complaint under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-39-113

and

1-39-114

(2017) of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, these provisions do not extend shorter statutes of limitations. The plain language of §

1-39-114

, prohibiting its use to extend shorter statutes of limitations, compels us to apply the statute of limitations at Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-3-107

. Wyo. Guardianship Corp. v. Wyo. State Hosp., 2018 WY 114, 428 P.3d 424,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2018).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For case note, “Wrongful Death — Siblings as Beneficiaries Under Wyoming's Wrongful Death Statutes, Wetering v. Eisele, 682 P.2d 1055,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 296

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 299 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of city as to compromise of claim, 15 ALR2d 1359.

Infancy or incapacity as affecting, under equal protection requirements, notice required as condition of holding municipality or other political subdivision liable for personal injury, 34 ALR2d 725.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, failure to give required notice of claim of injury to municipality, county, or other governmental agency or body, 65 ALR2d 1278.

Attorney's mistake or neglect as excuse for failing to file timely notice of tort claim against state or local governmental unit, 55 ALR3d 930.

Modern status of the law as to validity of statutes or ordinances requiring notice of tort claim against local governmental entity, 59 ALR3d 93.

Local government tort liability: minority as affecting notice of claim requirement, 58 ALR4th 402.

Insufficiency of notice of claim against municipality as regards statement of place where accident occurred, 69 ALR4th 484.

Complaint as satisfying requirement of notice of claim upon states, municipalities, and other political subdivisions, 45 ALR5th 109.

Persons or entities upon whom notice of injury or claim against state or state agencies may or must be served, 45 ALR5th 173.

Sufficiency of notice of claim against local governmental unit as regards identity, name, address, and residence of claimant, 53 ALR5th 617.

When is claim properly presented to federal agency, under 28 USC § 2675(a), for purposes of satisfying prerequisite to subsequent suit under Federal Tort Claims Act, 73 ALR Fed 338.

Applicability and effect of 28 USC § 2675(b) pertaining to increase in federal tort claim over amount presented to agency, 80 ALR Fed 737.